Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.055

Eligibility for state assistance for new construction—Inventory assessment exclusions—Rules.

(1) The rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction for determining eligibility for state assistance for new construction shall exclude from the inventory of available educational space those spaces that have been:

(a) Constructed for educational and community activities from grants received from other public or private entities; or

(b) Vacated by new construction in lieu of modernization; and

(i) Used for purposes of supporting state-funded all-day kindergarten or class size reduction in kindergarten through third grade, if the lack of district facilities warrants such a use; or

(ii) The district is experiencing a short-term special school housing burden due to enrollment growth and failed school construction bond elections within the prior five years.

(2) The exclusion in subsection (1)(b) of this section applies for state assistance for new construction awarded from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2021.

(3) Educational spaces with classrooms occupied by students specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section must meet the safety standards for public school facilities.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "school housing burden" means the current instructional facility inventory does not provide the classroom capacity needed for the current or projected enrollment of the school district, as determined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office shall give consideration to available instructional facility inventory or capacity of the neighboring school district.

[ 2016 c 159 s 1; 2006 c 263 s 304; 1994 c 219 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Finding—1994 c 219: See note following RCW 43.88.030.